test/src/gt-gloss-yamls/NA_VW_waawaatesi_gt-glossing.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:
     
  NA - VW - waawaatesi :
     
  #Template Key
  #1	2	3	4	5	6	7
  #per	dim	the	pej	pos	mod	num
     
     #Isolation form
     waawaatesi+NA: waawaatesi
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1
     1+waawaatesi+NA: nwaawaatesi
     2+waawaatesi+NA: gwaawaatesi
     X+waawaatesi+NA: waawaatesi
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2
     waawaatesi+NA+Con: waawaatesiinh
     waawaatesi+NA+Dim: waawaatesiins
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4
     waawaatesi+NA+Pej: waawaateswish
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6
     waawaatesi+NA+Prt: waawaateswiba
     waawaatesi+NA+Voc+Pl: waawaateswidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 7
     waawaatesi+NA+4: waawaateswan
     waawaatesi+NA+Loc: waawaatesiing
     waawaatesi+NA+Pl: waawaateswag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Con: nwaawaatesiinh
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Dim: nwaawaatesiins
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Con: gwaawaatesiinh
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Dim: gwaawaatesiins
     X+waawaatesi+NA+Con: waawaatesiinh
     X+waawaatesi+NA+Dim: waawaatesiins
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3
     1+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos: nwaawaatesiim
     2+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos: gwaawaatesiim
     X+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos: waawaatesiim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Pej: nwaawaateswish
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Pej: gwaawaateswish
     X+waawaatesi+NA+Pej: waawaateswish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5
     1+waawaatesi+NA+1+Pl: nwaawaatesiinaa
     2+waawaatesi+NA+1+Pl: gwaawaatesiinaa
     2+waawaatesi+NA+2+Pl: gwaawaateswiwaa
     3+waawaatesi+NA+3+4: waawaatesiini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 6
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Prt: nwaawaateswiba
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Voc+Pl: nwaawaateswidig
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Prt: gwaawaateswiba
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Voc+Pl: gwaawaateswidig
     X+waawaatesi+NA+Prt: waawaateswiba
     X+waawaatesi+NA+Voc+Pl: waawaateswidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 7
     1+waawaatesi+NA+4: nwaawaateswan
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Loc: nwaawaatesiing
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Pl: nwaawaateswag
     2+waawaatesi+NA+4: gwaawaateswan
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Loc: gwaawaatesiing
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Pl: gwaawaateswag
     3+waawaatesi+NA+4: waawaateswan
     3+waawaatesi+NA+Loc: waawaatesiing
     X+waawaatesi+NA+4: waawaateswan
     X+waawaatesi+NA+Loc: waawaatesiing
     X+waawaatesi+NA+Pl: waawaateswag
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4
     waawaatesi+NA+Con+Pej: waawaatesiinyish
     waawaatesi+NA+Dim+Pej: waawaatesiinsish
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 6
     waawaatesi+NA+Con+Prt: waawaatesiinyba
     waawaatesi+NA+Con+Voc+Pl: waawaatesiinydig
     waawaatesi+NA+Dim+Prt: waawaatesiinsba
     waawaatesi+NA+Dim+Voc+Pl: waawaatesiinsdig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 7
     waawaatesi+NA+Con+4: waawaatesiinyin
     waawaatesi+NA+Con+Loc: waawaatesiinying
     waawaatesi+NA+Con+Pl: waawaatesiinyig
     waawaatesi+NA+Dim+4: waawaatesiinsan
     waawaatesi+NA+Dim+Loc: waawaatesiinsing
     waawaatesi+NA+Dim+Pl: waawaatesiinsag
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 6
     waawaatesi+NA+Pej+Prt: waawaateswishba
     waawaatesi+NA+Pej+Voc+Pl: waawaateswishdig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 7
     waawaatesi+NA+Pej+4: waawaateswishan
     waawaatesi+NA+Pej+Loc: waawaateswishing
     waawaatesi+NA+Pej+Pl: waawaateswishag
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6, 7
     waawaatesi+NA+Prt+4: waawaateswibniin
     waawaatesi+NA+Prt+Loc: waawaateswibniing
     waawaatesi+NA+Prt+Pl: waawaateswibniig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Con+ThmPos: nwaawaatesiinyim
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+ThmPos: nwaawaatesiinsim
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Con+ThmPos: gwaawaatesiinyim
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+ThmPos: gwaawaatesiinsim
     X+waawaatesi+NA+Con+ThmPos: waawaatesiinyim
     X+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+ThmPos: waawaatesiinsim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Con+Pej: nwaawaatesiinyish
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+Pej: nwaawaatesiinsish
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Con+Pej: gwaawaatesiinyish
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+Pej: gwaawaatesiinsish
     X+waawaatesi+NA+Con+Pej: waawaatesiinyish
     X+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+Pej: waawaatesiinsish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Con+1+Pl: nwaawaatesiinynaa
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+1+Pl: nwaawaatesiinsnaa
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Con+1+Pl: gwaawaatesiinynaa
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Con+2+Pl: gwaawaatesiinywaa
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+1+Pl: gwaawaatesiinsnaa
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+2+Pl: gwaawaatesiinswaa
     3+waawaatesi+NA+Con+3+4: waawaatesiinyni
     3+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+3+4: waawaatesiinsni
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 6
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Con+Prt: nwaawaatesiinyba
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Con+Voc+Pl: nwaawaatesiinydig
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+Prt: nwaawaatesiinsba
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+Voc+Pl: nwaawaatesiinsdig
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Con+Prt: gwaawaatesiinyba
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Con+Voc+Pl: gwaawaatesiinydig
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+Prt: gwaawaatesiinsba
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+Voc+Pl: gwaawaatesiinsdig
     X+waawaatesi+NA+Con+Prt: waawaatesiinyba
     X+waawaatesi+NA+Con+Voc+Pl: waawaatesiinydig
     X+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+Prt: waawaatesiinsba
     X+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+Voc+Pl: waawaatesiinsdig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 7
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Con+4: nwaawaatesiinyin
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Con+Loc: nwaawaatesiinying
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Con+Pl: nwaawaatesiinyig
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+4: nwaawaatesiinsan
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+Loc: nwaawaatesiinsing
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+Pl: nwaawaatesiinsag
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Con+4: gwaawaatesiinyin
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Con+Loc: gwaawaatesiinying
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Con+Pl: gwaawaatesiinyig
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+4: gwaawaatesiinsan
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+Loc: gwaawaatesiinsing
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+Pl: gwaawaatesiinsag
     3+waawaatesi+NA+Con+4: waawaatesiinyin
     3+waawaatesi+NA+Con+Loc: waawaatesiinying
     3+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+4: waawaatesiinsan
     3+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+Loc: waawaatesiinsing
     X+waawaatesi+NA+Con+4: waawaatesiinyin
     X+waawaatesi+NA+Con+Loc: waawaatesiinying
     X+waawaatesi+NA+Con+Pl: waawaatesiinyig
     X+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+4: waawaatesiinsan
     X+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+Loc: waawaatesiinsing
     X+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+Pl: waawaatesiinsag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4
     1+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+Pej: nwaawaatesiimish
     2+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+Pej: gwaawaatesiimish
     X+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+Pej: waawaatesiimish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5
     1+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl: nwaawaatesiimnaa
     2+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl: gwaawaatesiimnaa
     2+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl: gwaawaatesiimwaa
     3+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+3+4: waawaatesiimni
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 6
     1+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+Prt: nwaawaatesiimba
     1+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: nwaawaatesiimdig
     2+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+Prt: gwaawaatesiimba
     2+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: gwaawaatesiimdig
     X+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+Prt: waawaatesiimba
     X+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: waawaatesiimdig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 7
     1+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+4: nwaawaatesiiman
     1+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+Loc: nwaawaatesiiming
     1+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+Pl: nwaawaatesiimag
     2+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+4: gwaawaatesiiman
     2+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+Loc: gwaawaatesiiming
     2+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+Pl: gwaawaatesiimag
     3+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+4: waawaatesiiman
     3+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+Loc: waawaatesiiming
     X+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+4: waawaatesiiman
     X+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+Loc: waawaatesiiming
     X+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+Pl: waawaatesiimag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Pej+1+Pl: nwaawaateswishnaa
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Pej+1+Pl: gwaawaateswishnaa
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Pej+2+Pl: gwaawaateswishwaa
     3+waawaatesi+NA+Pej+3+4: waawaateswishni
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 6
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Pej+Prt: nwaawaateswishba
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Pej+Voc+Pl: nwaawaateswishdig
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Pej+Prt: gwaawaateswishba
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Pej+Voc+Pl: gwaawaateswishdig
     X+waawaatesi+NA+Pej+Prt: waawaateswishba
     X+waawaatesi+NA+Pej+Voc+Pl: waawaateswishdig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 7
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Pej+4: nwaawaateswishan
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Pej+Loc: nwaawaateswishing
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Pej+Pl: nwaawaateswishag
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Pej+4: gwaawaateswishan
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Pej+Loc: gwaawaateswishing
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Pej+Pl: gwaawaateswishag
     3+waawaatesi+NA+Pej+4: waawaateswishan
     3+waawaatesi+NA+Pej+Loc: waawaateswishing
     X+waawaatesi+NA+Pej+4: waawaateswishan
     X+waawaatesi+NA+Pej+Loc: waawaateswishing
     X+waawaatesi+NA+Pej+Pl: waawaateswishag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5, 6
     1+waawaatesi+NA+1+Pl+Prt: nwaawaatesiinaanba
     1+waawaatesi+NA+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: nwaawaatesiinaandig
     2+waawaatesi+NA+1+Pl+Prt: gwaawaatesiinaanba
     2+waawaatesi+NA+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gwaawaatesiinaandig
     2+waawaatesi+NA+2+Pl+Prt: gwaawaateswiwaaba
     2+waawaatesi+NA+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: gwaawaateswiwaadig
     3+waawaatesi+NA+3+4+Prt: waawaatesiinwiba
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5, 7
     1+waawaatesi+NA+1+Pl+4: nwaawaatesiinaanin
     1+waawaatesi+NA+1+Pl+Loc: nwaawaatesiinaaning
     1+waawaatesi+NA+1+Pl+Pl: nwaawaatesiinaanig
     2+waawaatesi+NA+1+Pl+4: gwaawaatesiinaanin
     2+waawaatesi+NA+1+Pl+Loc: gwaawaatesiinaaning
     2+waawaatesi+NA+1+Pl+Pl: gwaawaatesiinaanig
     2+waawaatesi+NA+2+Pl+4: gwaawaateswiwaan
     2+waawaatesi+NA+2+Pl+Loc: gwaawaateswiwaang
     2+waawaatesi+NA+2+Pl+Pl: gwaawaateswiwaag
     3+waawaatesi+NA+2+Pl+4: waawaateswiwaan
     3+waawaatesi+NA+2+Pl+Loc: waawaateswiwaang
     3+waawaatesi+NA+3+4+4: waawaatesiinwan
     3+waawaatesi+NA+3+4+Loc: waawaatesiiniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 6, 7
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Prt+4: nwaawaateswibniin
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Prt+Loc: nwaawaateswibniing
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Prt+Pl: nwaawaateswibniig
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Prt+4: gwaawaateswibniin
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Prt+Loc: gwaawaateswibniing
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Prt+Pl: gwaawaateswibniig
     3+waawaatesi+NA+Prt+4: waawaateswibniin
     3+waawaatesi+NA+Prt+Loc: waawaateswibniing
     X+waawaatesi+NA+Prt+4: waawaateswibniin
     X+waawaatesi+NA+Prt+Loc: waawaateswibniing
     X+waawaatesi+NA+Prt+Pl: waawaateswibniig
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 6
     waawaatesi+NA+Con+Pej+Prt: waawaatesiinyshiba
     waawaatesi+NA+Con+Pej+Voc+Pl: waawaatesiinyshidig
     waawaatesi+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt: waawaatesiinsshiba
     waawaatesi+NA+Dim+Pej+Voc+Pl: waawaatesiinsshidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 7
     waawaatesi+NA+Con+Pej+4: waawaatesiinyshan
     waawaatesi+NA+Con+Pej+Loc: waawaatesiinyshing
     waawaatesi+NA+Con+Pej+Pl: waawaatesiinyshag
     waawaatesi+NA+Dim+Pej+4: waawaatesiinsshan
     waawaatesi+NA+Dim+Pej+Loc: waawaatesiinsshing
     waawaatesi+NA+Dim+Pej+Pl: waawaatesiinsshag
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 6, 7
     waawaatesi+NA+Con+Prt+4: waawaatesiinybaniin
     waawaatesi+NA+Con+Prt+Loc: waawaatesiinybaniing
     waawaatesi+NA+Con+Prt+Pl: waawaatesiinybaniig
     waawaatesi+NA+Dim+Prt+4: waawaatesiinsbaniin
     waawaatesi+NA+Dim+Prt+Loc: waawaatesiinsbaniing
     waawaatesi+NA+Dim+Prt+Pl: waawaatesiinsbaniig
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 6, 7
     waawaatesi+NA+Pej+Prt+4: waawaateswishbaniin
